Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1003
Customer, defined.

Customer shall mean the owner or renter of any residential, agricultural, or commercial building in the state for which there is purchased, from a utility, electricity to be used for either space heating or cooling or the heating of water for domestic purposes. Owners of mobile homes may be included in this definition at the option of the utility involved.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 16.